Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1703YH (3) 91 sc/ns H.F. 267 Section 1. Section 97A.1, subsection 6, Code 2025, is 1 amended by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu 2 thereof the following: 3 6. âCancerâ means a group of diseases involving abnormal 4 cell growth with the potential to invade or spread to other 5 parts of the body. 6 Sec. 2. Section 411.1, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended 7 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 8 following: 9 6. âCancerâ means a group of diseases involving abnormal 10 cell growth with the potential to invade or spread to other 11 parts of the body. 12 Sec. 3. IMPLEMENTATION OF ACT. Section 25B.2, subsection 13 3, shall not apply to this Act. 14